src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/verb-perfect_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst

Tests:
  
  NORM GEN generates one for short tags, nothing with +Err/-Norm:
    car-+V+Past+Perf+Sing: [acárie, ~cárie]
    car-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing: ~cárie
    car-+V+Past+Perf+Plur: [acárier, ~cárier]
    car-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Plur: ~cárier
    car-+V+Past+Perf+Sing+1: [acárien, acárienye, ~cárien, ~cárienye]
    car-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing+1: [~cárien, ~cárienye]
